Utah statutes.
59-1-702.   Jeopardy assessment -- Notice -- Amount.
(1)  If the commission believes that the assessment or collection of any tax
or penalty in lieu of tax will be jeopardized by delay, it shall,
notwithstanding the assessment provisions of Title 59, Chapter 2, 7, 10, or
12, immediately assess such tax or penalty in lieu of tax (together with all
interest, penalties, and additions to tax provided for by law), and notice and
demand shall be made by the commission for the payment thereof.
(2)  If the jeopardy assessment is made before any notice of the tax
deficiency to which the jeopardy assessment relates has been mailed under
Title 59, Chapter 2, 7, 10, or 12, then the commission shall mail a notice
under this section within 60 days after the making of the assessment.
(3)  The jeopardy assessment may be made of a deficiency greater or less than
that set forth in the notice of deficiency, which has been mailed to the
taxpayer, and whether or not the taxpayer has filed a petition with the
commission.  The commission may, at any time before rendering its decision,
abate such assessment, or any unpaid portion thereof, to the extent that it
believes the assessment to be excessive in amount.  The commission has
jurisdiction to redetermine the entire amount of the deficiency and of all
amounts assessed.
(4)  If the jeopardy assessment is made after the commission has rendered a
decision on a taxpayer's petition for redetermination, the assessment may be
made only in respect to the amount of the deficiency determined by the
commission in its decision.
